


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×








 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×








 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×































Home


Site Map


About Us


Media Kit


Contact Us


Help











Register Now
Why register?


Login
























							 The leading web portal for pharmacy resources, news, education and careers
						

							July 26, 2017
						










News

Drug Delivery Systems
Drugstores
FDA Final Approvals
Front Page Healthcare News
Generic Drugs
Hospital Industry
Internet Pharmacy
IT in Healthcare
Medicare & Medicaid
Over-the-Counter Drugs
Pharm Industry Trends and Policy
Pharmaceutical Development
Pharmaceutical Industry


Pharmacy Careers

Pharmacist
Pharmacy Technician
Pharmacy Job Board
Job Placement Help
So you want a job as a pharmacist?
Start your career as a:pharmacy technician


Resources

Boards of Pharmacy
Drug Database
FDA Resources
Pharmacy Associations
Pharmacy Journals
Pharmacy Newsletters
State Associations
More...


Education

Certification Courses
Continuing Education
Disease State Management
International Pharmacy Schools
Live On-Line CE
Pharmacy Schools
Pharmacy Technician Training


Business

Advertising Information / Media Kit
Consulting
Contact Us
Pharmacy Marketing


Marketplace

Drug Manufacturers
Drug Wholesalers
Automation and Robotics
Compounding Supplies
Medication & Supply Dispensing Systems
Tablet & Capsule Counters
Wholesalers & Distributors
More...
























Pharmacy Choice - Pharmaceutical News - Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer - July 26, 2017
Pharmacy News Article






							 9/20/16 - Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer
						



CAMBRIDGE, Mass., Sept.  20, 2016  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE)  Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AEGR), a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, today announced the appointment of Remi A. Menes as chief commercial officer, effective immediately.
Mary Szela, Chief Executive Officer of Aegerion said, Remi brings extensive pre-launch and launch expertise and a proven ability to develop and lead commercial efforts globally. Commercialization of rare disease therapies takes a targeted approach and requires strong patient focus. Remi's broad experience implementing holistic, patient-centered programs that demonstrate the value proposition of therapies make him ideally suited to lead our commercial operations globally, including our sales, marketing and market access efforts. We look forward to his contributions as we continue to drive and evolve our global commercial operations, and particularly as we prepare to submit a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT in the EU by year-end and, upon anticipated marketing approval, launch JUXTAPID in Japan. Remi Menes most recently served as the General Manager of AbbVie Finland, where he was responsible for the Affiliate's operations and P&L and its flagship product Humira. He also served as Board Member of Pharma Industry Finland. Before joining AbbVie Finland in 2013, Mr. Menes served as Area Commercial Director, Virology & Neonatal Care, Western Europe & Canada at AbbVie Europe. From 2008-2010, he was the Commercial Director, Specialty Products Division and a Member of the Affiliate Leadership Team at Abbott Canada. Between 1990 and 2008, Mr. Menes held a series of roles of increasing responsibility at Merck Frosst Canada Ltd., including Director, Sales & Marketing, in which he led the Canadian launch of SINGULAIR for Allergic Rhinitis, and Product Manager for SINGULAIR and PROPECIA/PROSCAR. He holds an Executive M.B.A. and a B.Sc. in Organic Chemistry with a minor in Business Studies from Concordia University. About Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Aegerion Pharmaceuticals is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases. For more information about the company, please visit www.aegerion.com. Forward-Looking StatementsThis press release contains forward-looking statements, including statements regarding: the anticipated submission of a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT in the EU and the anticipated approval and launch of JUXTAPID in Japan. These forward-looking statements are neither promises nor guarantees of future performance, and are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. In particular, the risks and uncertainties include, among others: the risk that regulatory authorities in regions or countries where either of our products is not yet approved may refuse to approve such products, such approvals are not made on a timely basis or such approvals impose significant restrictions or require additional development; and the other risks inherent in the commercialization, drug development and regulatory approval process. For additional disclosure regarding these and other risks we face, see the disclosure contained in the "Risk Factors" section of Aegerion's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 9, 2016, and our other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, available on the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. We undertake no obligation to update or revise the information contained in this press release, whether as a result of new information, future events or circumstances or otherwise. Investors and others should note that we communicate with our investors and the public using our company website (www.aegerion.com) and our investor relations website (http://ir.aegerion.com), including but not limited to company disclosures; investor presentations and FAQs; Securities and Exchange Commission filings; press releases; public conference calls and webcasts. The information that we post on these websites could be deemed to be material information. As a result, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested to review the information that we post there on a regular basis. The contents of our website shall not be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
CONTACT:
Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
Amanda Murphy, Associate Director, Investor & Public Relations
857-242-5024
Amanda.murphy@aegerion.com


Source: Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
						





2016 GlobeNewswire, Inc.



















		Pharmacy News Index
		






						  Drug Delivery Systems




						  Drugstores




						  FDA Final Approvals




						  Front Page Healthcare News




						  Generic Drugs




						  Hospital Industry




						  Internet Pharmacy




						  IT in Healthcare




						  Medicare & Medicaid




						  Over-the-Counter Drugs




						  Pharm Industry Trends and Policy




						  Pharmaceutical Development




						  Pharmaceutical Industry













LIVE ONLINE CE









Jul 26: Management of Schizophrenia & Acute Agitation










Jul 27: On the Move: A Comprehensive Review of Osteoarthritis, Gout & Rheumatoid Arthritis





Jul 31: Obesity Management: Overview of Pharmacotherapy





Aug 01: Treatment of Depression and Anxiety in Older Adults





Aug 02: Adverse Drug Events: Risk Reduction & Documentation





Click for entire Webinar Calendar










			Special Announcement
		















				Free Membership
				



					Enjoy Drug Search, industry newsletters and more...
					










			Nursing Jobs
		



			Are you a nurse looking for a job?
			Check out the Nursing Job Source.
			Your number one choice for nursing jobs.
		
















			Websites  »  RxCareerCenter.com • RxSchool.com • ClubStaffing.com • NursingJobSource.com • RN.com








NEWS
Drug Delivery Systems
Drugstores
FDA Final Approvals
Front Page Healthcare News
Generic Drugs
Hospital Industry
Internet Pharmacy
IT in Healthcare
Medicare & Medicaid
Over-the-Counter Drugs
Pharm Industry Trends and Policy
Pharmaceutical Development
Pharmaceutical Industry


CAREERS
Pharmacist
Pharmacy Technician
Pharmacy Job Board
Jobs Placement Help
So you want a job as a pharmacist?
Start your career as apharmacy technician


RESOURCES
Boards of Pharmacy
Drug Databases
FDA Resources
Pharmacy Associations
Pharmacy Journals
Pharmacy Newsletters
State Associations
More...


EDUCATION
Certification Courses
Continuing Education
Disease State Management
International Pharmacy Schools
Live On-Line CE
Pharmacy CE
Pharmacy Schools
Pharmacy Tech Training


BUSINESS
Advertising Information
Consulting
Contact Us
Pharmacy Marketing


MARKETPLACE
Drug Manufacturers
Drug Wholesalers
Automation and Robotics
Compounding Supplies
Medication & Supply   Dispensing Systems
Tablet & Capsule Counters
Wholesalers & Distributors
More...


MOST POPULAR
Pharmacy Jobs
Continuing Education
FDA Resources
Drug Information
Pharmacy News
Disease States
Pharm Tech Training






				Copyright © 2017 Pharmacy Choice - All rights reserved.
Terms and Conditions | Privacy Statement 
				888-682-4415 









 








Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes As Chief Commercial Officer - TheStreet




































































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes As Chief Commercial Officer






GlobeNewswire



Sep 20, 2016 8:50 AM EDT













 




























































 CAMBRIDGE, Mass., Sept. 20, 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AEGR), a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, today announced the appointment of Remi A. Menes as chief commercial officer, effective immediately. Mary Szela, Chief Executive Officer of Aegerion said, "Remi brings extensive pre-launch and launch expertise and a proven ability to develop and lead commercial efforts globally. Commercialization of rare disease therapies takes a targeted approach and requires strong patient focus. Remi's broad experience implementing holistic, patient-centered programs that demonstrate the value proposition of therapies make him ideally suited to lead our commercial operations globally, including our sales, marketing and market access efforts. We look forward to his contributions as we continue to drive and evolve our global commercial operations, and particularly as we prepare to submit a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT® in the EU by year-end and, upon anticipated marketing approval, launch JUXTAPID® in Japan." Remi Menes most recently served as the General Manager of AbbVie Finland, where he was responsible for the Affiliate's operations and P&L and its flagship product Humira. He also served as Board Member of Pharma Industry Finland. Before joining AbbVie Finland in 2013, Mr. Menes served as Area Commercial Director, Virology & Neonatal Care, Western Europe & Canada at AbbVie Europe. From 2008-2010, he was the Commercial Director, Specialty Products Division and a Member of the Affiliate Leadership Team at Abbott Canada. Between 1990 and 2008, Mr. Menes held a series of roles of increasing responsibility at Merck Frosst Canada Ltd., including Director, Sales & Marketing, in which he led the Canadian launch of SINGULAIR® for Allergic Rhinitis, and Product Manager for SINGULAIR and PROPECIA®/PROSCAR®. He holds an Executive M.B.A. and a B.Sc. in Organic Chemistry with a minor in Business Studies from Concordia University.  



 








 










































If you liked this article you might like













5 Stocks Insiders Love Right Now
Insiders at these companies are scooping up shares of their own stock lately.



Roberto Pedone

Sep 14, 2016 1:36 PM EDT
























7 Stocks Under $10 Making Big Up Moves
When a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.



Roberto Pedone

Aug 24, 2016 7:08 AM EDT
























5 Stocks Under $10 Set to Soar
These under-$10 stocks are within range of triggering breakout trades.



Roberto Pedone

Jun 16, 2016 1:42 PM EDT
























Wall Street Loses Gains After Fed's Unsurprising June Call
The results of the Federal Reserve's June meeting were not a surprise. The central bank left rates unchanged just as Wall Street expected.



Keris Alison Lahiff

Jun 15, 2016 4:14 PM EDT








































 











Trending


Facebook Could Plunge by 5% or More in a Few Hours


Corning Takes Damaging Hit on Earnings -- Here's Where Investors Can Buy


Advanced Micro Devices Could Explode Another 17% Within Hours: Chart


When Will Google and Microsoft Finally Break Out Cloud Sales, as Amazon Does?


Jim Cramer Reveals What to Watch in Southwest Airlines, Dow Chemical and Starbucks Earnings











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer - MarketWatch




















































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers




















press release


					Sept. 20, 2016, 8:50 a.m. EDT
				
Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer
























CAMBRIDGE, Mass., Sep 20, 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE via COMTEX) --


                                        

Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
, a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, today announced the appointment of Remi A. Menes as chief commercial officer, effective immediately.


                                        








Mary Szela, Chief Executive Officer of Aegerion said, "Remi brings extensive pre-launch and launch expertise and a proven ability to develop and lead commercial efforts globally. Commercialization of rare disease therapies takes a targeted approach and requires strong patient focus. Remi's broad experience implementing holistic, patient-centered programs that demonstrate the value proposition of therapies make him ideally suited to lead our commercial operations globally, including our sales, marketing and market access efforts. We look forward to his contributions as we continue to drive and evolve our global commercial operations, and particularly as we prepare to submit a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT(R) in the EU by year-end and, upon anticipated marketing approval, launch JUXTAPID(R) in Japan."


                                        








Remi Menes most recently served as the General Manager of AbbVie Finland, where he was responsible for the Affiliate's operations and P&L and its flagship product Humira. He also served as Board Member of Pharma Industry Finland. Before joining AbbVie Finland in 2013, Mr. Menes served as Area Commercial Director, Virology & Neonatal Care, Western Europe & Canada at AbbVie Europe. From 2008-2010, he was the Commercial Director, Specialty Products Division and a Member of the Affiliate Leadership Team at Abbott Canada. Between 1990 and 2008, Mr. Menes held a series of roles of increasing responsibility at Merck Frosst Canada Ltd., including Director, Sales & Marketing, in which he led the Canadian launch of SINGULAIR(R) for Allergic Rhinitis, and Product Manager for SINGULAIR and PROPECIA(R)/PROSCAR(R). He holds an Executive M.B.A. and a B.Sc. in Organic Chemistry with a minor in Business Studies from Concordia University.


                                        








About Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.        
Aegerion Pharmaceuticals is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases.  For more information about the company, please visit         www.aegerion.com
.


                                        








Forward-Looking StatementsThis press release contains forward-looking statements, including statements regarding: the anticipated submission of a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT in the EU and the anticipated approval and launch of JUXTAPID in Japan. These forward-looking statements are neither promises nor guarantees of future performance, and are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. In particular, the risks and uncertainties include, among others: the risk that regulatory authorities in regions or countries where either of our products is not yet approved may refuse to approve such products, such approvals are not made on a timely basis or such approvals impose significant restrictions or require additional development; and the other risks inherent in the commercialization, drug development and regulatory approval process. For additional disclosure regarding these and other risks we face, see the disclosure contained in the "Risk Factors" section of Aegerion's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 9, 2016, and our other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, available on the SEC's website at         http://www.sec.gov
. We undertake no obligation to update or revise the information contained in this press release, whether as a result of new information, future events or circumstances or otherwise.


                                        








Investors and others should note that we communicate with our investors and the public using our company website (        www.aegerion.com
) and our investor relations website (        http://ir.aegerion.com
), including but not limited to company disclosures; investor presentations and FAQs; Securities and Exchange Commission filings; press releases; public conference calls and webcasts. The information that we post on these websites could be deemed to be material information. As a result, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested to review the information that we post there on a regular basis. The contents of our website shall not be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.


                                        













        
        CONTACT:
        Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
        Amanda Murphy, Associate Director, Investor & Public Relations
        857-242-5024
        Amanda.murphy@aegerion.com
        
        






 

















Copyright (C) 2016 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All rights reserved.
                    



































Most Popular





1.






Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.






2.






If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one






3.





Outside the Box

The Apple Car could run traditional automakers off the road






4.





Market Snapshot

U.S. stocks trade in record territory ahead of Fed policy decision






5.






Spicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job








Find a Broker

Partner Center »























Featured Stories





Seeing America again through new eyes







How to dig yourself out of debt







Move over, Tesla? Karma unveils its hybrid sports car







The salary you need to afford a home in these 25 cities







Why OPEC will never cut production again













Log In




2:56 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
2:55pDollar turns lower after Fed is read as adopting a more dovish tone
2:52pA.O. Smith’s bet on China’s air pollution problem is paying off
2:49pWall Street's 'fear gauge' posts lowest intraday level in its history
2:48pGold settles lower, but gets boost after Fed policy statement
2:46pFed to wind down bond holdings ‘relatively soon’
2:43pOil prices settle at a roughly 2-month high
2:40pDonald Trump is winning the currency cold war: Pimco
2:40pWhere to get Chipotle queso: check out this interactive map
2:36pSept. WTI oil settles at $48.75/bbl, up 86 cents, or 1.8%
2:36pWTI oil prices log highest finish in about 8 weeks
2:33pU.S. stocks trade in record territory as Fed stands pat on interest rates  
2:28pEverything you wanted to know about Trump’s transgender military ban
2:24pInvestment chief who manages $19 billion sees big gains on the ‘frontier’
2:23pBREAKINGCBOE Volatility Index briefly drops to all-time low of 8.85 after Fed meeting
2:21pHealth-care fund managers say a spike in drugs and devices will produce big returns
2:14pDollar turns negative after Fed statement
2:13pFilm Clip: 'Detroit'
2:09pGold ends at 1-week low, then inches higher in electronic trade after Fed statement
2:08pFilm Clip: 'Atomic Blonde'
2:08pTreasury yields slip after release of Fed policy statement for July meeting
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,702.48

+89.05
+0.41%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,420.28

+8.11
+0.13%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,478.71

+1.58
+0.06%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



























































Remi Menes 的个人主页 | Facebook


Facebook邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017

















 




Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer

























Home > News > Market News Sep, 2016 > Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial... 
  


  


  


		Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes As Chief Commercial Officer		



Posted by Globe Newswire
| published by 
Amigobulls
on 
					Sep 20, 2016


Related Ticker: AEGR 







CAMBRIDGE, Mass., Sept.  20, 2016  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AEGR), a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, today announced the appointment of Remi A. Menes as chief commercial officer, effective immediately.
Mary Szela, Chief Executive Officer of Aegerion said, “Remi brings extensive pre-launch and launch expertise and a proven ability to develop and lead commercial efforts globally. Commercialization of rare disease therapies takes a targeted approach and requires strong patient focus. Remi’s broad experience implementing holistic, patient-centered programs that demonstrate the value proposition of therapies make him ideally suited to lead our commercial operations globally, including our sales, marketing and market access efforts. We look forward to his contributions as we continue to drive and evolve our global commercial operations, and particularly as we prepare to submit a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT® in the EU by year-end and, upon anticipated marketing approval, launch JUXTAPID® in Japan.”
Remi Menes most recently served as the General Manager of AbbVie Finland, where he was responsible for the Affiliate’s operations and P&L and its flagship product Humira. He also served as Board Member of Pharma Industry Finland. Before joining AbbVie Finland in 2013, Mr. Menes served as Area Commercial Director, Virology & Neonatal Care, Western Europe & Canada at AbbVie Europe. From 2008-2010, he was the Commercial Director, Specialty Products Division and a Member of the Affiliate Leadership Team at Abbott Canada. Between 1990 and 2008, Mr. Menes held a series of roles of increasing responsibility at Merck Frosst Canada Ltd., including Director, Sales & Marketing, in which he led the Canadian launch of SINGULAIR® for Allergic Rhinitis, and Product Manager for SINGULAIR and PROPECIA®/PROSCAR®. He holds an Executive M.B.A. and a B.Sc. in Organic Chemistry with a minor in Business Studies from Concordia University.
About Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Aegerion Pharmaceuticals is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases.  For more information about the company, please visit www.aegerion.com.
Forward-Looking StatementsThis press release contains forward-looking statements, including statements regarding: the anticipated submission of a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT in the EU and the anticipated approval and launch of JUXTAPID in Japan. These forward-looking statements are neither promises nor guarantees of future performance, and are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. In particular, the risks and uncertainties include, among others: the risk that regulatory authorities in regions or countries where either of our products is not yet approved may refuse to approve such products, such approvals are not made on a timely basis or such approvals impose significant restrictions or require additional development; and the other risks inherent in the commercialization, drug development and regulatory approval process. For additional disclosure regarding these and other risks we face, see the disclosure contained in the "Risk Factors" section of Aegerion's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 9, 2016, and our other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, available on the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. We undertake no obligation to update or revise the information contained in this press release, whether as a result of new information, future events or circumstances or otherwise.
Investors and others should note that we communicate with our investors and the public using our company website (www.aegerion.com) and our investor relations website (http://ir.aegerion.com), including but not limited to company disclosures; investor presentations and FAQs; Securities and Exchange Commission filings; press releases; public conference calls and webcasts. The information that we post on these websites could be deemed to be material information. As a result, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested to review the information that we post there on a regular basis. The contents of our website shall not be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

CONTACT: Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.                                                         Amanda Murphy, Associate Director, Investor & Public Relations                                  857-242-5024   Amanda.murphy@aegerion.com





Latest Stock Market News
 






Top 3 Earnings Today - AMD, Chipotle And AT&T



	            		AMD, CMG	              

	              	Jul 25, 2017	
	              



	    			Some of the today's notable earnings are Advanced Micro Devices, Inc.(NASDAQ:AMD), Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc.(NYSE:CMG) and AT&T Inc. (NYSE:T).	    		




 






GILD Stock: Is Gilead Stock A Good Buy Ahead Of Q2 Earnings?



	            		GILD	              

	              	Jul 25, 2017	
	              



	    			Gilead Sciences, Inc. (NASDAQ:GILD) is set to announce its Q2 2017 earnings on July 26th. Will HCV/HIV Drug Commentary lift GILD stock Higher?	    		




 






Book Profits In Twitter Stock Ahead Of Q2 Earnings



	            		TWTR	              

	              	Jul 25, 2017	
	              



	    			The question isn't whether Twitter Inc (NYSE:TWTR) earnings will miss or a beat estimates, but if Twitter can really turn things around.	    		




 






NVIDIA Corporation Stock: Why Analysts Are Bullish On This Expensive Stock



	            		NVDA, AMD	              

	              	Jul 25, 2017	
	              



	    			NVIDIA Corporation (NASDAQ:NVDA) has seen its valuation multiples like PE ratio expand. However, Analysts still remain bullish on NVIDIA stock.	    		




 






Buy Netflix Stock, Sell Tesla Stock And Chipotle Stock - Today's Technical Trading Ideas



	            		NFLX, TSLA	              

	              	Jul 24, 2017	
	              



	    			Today's top technical trading ideas. Buy Netflix, Inc. (NASDAQ: NFLX) stock, Sell Tesla Inc (NASDAQ:TSLA) stock and Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (NYSE:CMG) stock.	    		




 






Facebook Inc: Is FB stock All Set For A Post-Earnings Rally?



	            		FB	              

	              	Jul 24, 2017	
	              



	    			Facebook Inc. (NASDAQ:FB) is set to report its Q2 2017 earnings after the bell on July 26th. Will the Q2 earnings lift FB stock to fresh all-time highs?	    		




 





 Share this article via Email





 Share this article on Twitter





 Share this article on Facebook





 Share this article on linkedin





 Share this article on GooglePlus












 Comments on  AEGR stock 












post
 







bullish
neutral
bearish















 Do share this awesome post  


 











AVEO

















Watch Our AVEO Pharmaceuticals Stock Analysis Video  - 1.7/5









Related Aegerion Pharma News

Aegerion Pharmaceuticals’ JUXTAPID® (lomitapide) Capsules for the Treatment of Homozygous Familial Hypercholesterolemia (HoFH) Receives Pricing Authorization in Japan


Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Announces Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


QLT's (QLTI) Reports In-Line Q3 Loss, Merger in Focus


Forget Novavax, Buy These 4 Biotech Stocks Instead


Seattle Genetics (SGEN) Posts Wider-than-Expected Q1 Loss


Keryx (KERX) Q1 Loss in Line, Auryxia Up on Strong Demand (Revised)
 


Investment ideas

Here’s Why Warren Buffett Continues To Bet On IBM Stock


The Facebook Growth Story From IPO Till Now


Is A Stock Market Crash Imminent In 2015?


Warren Buffett and Diversification


5 Valuable Investment Quotes from Warren Buffett


Our approach to Technology Stock Analysis
 











 


  


 
























Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (via Public) / Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer



























                        Hello .
                    


 United States 







News


International News


Education


Environment


Healthcare


Technology


Internet




Science


Social and Non-Profit


Local News




Politicsand Policy


Government


Politics


Local Government


International Policy




Businessand Economy


Economy


Finance


Stock Markets




Jobs and Labor


Company News


Industry News


Aerospace


Agriculture


Chemicals


Commodities


Construction


Consumer Electronics


Defense


Energy


Nuclear Energy


Oil and Gas


Renewable Energy




Financial Services


Banking


Insurance




Fishing and Aquaculture


Manufacturing


Information Technology


Metals and Mining


Pharmaceuticals and Biotechnology


Real Estate


Professional and Business Services


Legal




Telecommunications


Tobacco


Retail


Transportation


Air Transportation


Maritime Transportation


Rail Transportation


Road Transportation




Utilities


Forestry and Wood Industry






Artsand Culture


Art


Books and Literature


Entertainment


Cinema


Media


Radio and Television




Music






Lifestyleand Leisure


Automotive


Home and Garden


Fashion and Luxury


Clothing and Textile




Food


Travel and Hospitality


Boating and Yachting




Sports


Baseball


Basketball


Boxing


Cricket


Cycling


Football (American)


Football (Australian)


Football (Soccer)


Golf


Hockey


Racing


Rugby


Sailing


Skiing and Winter Sports


Tennis


Volleyball











noodls browser compatibility check

The security settings of your browser are blocking the execution of scripts.
To use noodls, javascript support must be enabled. Please change your browser's security settings to enable javascript.
If you have changed your browser's security settings, you can click here.






related announcements
Local News


California Labor Federation
As Trump Pushes to Roll Back Overtime Pay, California Legislature Must[...]


Colorado Department of Transportation
TRAFFIC ADVISORY: CDOT crews paving on CO 82 in Aspen next week


Colorado Department of Transportation
I-25 Alternating Lane Closures in Huerfano County Tomorrow


More
Business and Economy


Fitch Inc.
Fitch: Higher Markets and Interest Rates Drive State Street's 2Q17 Earnings


First Citizens BancShares Inc.
First Citizens BancShares Reports Earnings For Second Quarter 2017


U.S. Senate Committee on[...]
Vice Chairman Leahy Statement on the President’s Fiscal Year 2018[...]


More











search





















Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Inc.



09/20/2016 | Press release | Distributed by Public on 09/20/2016 06:51
Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer








        August 9, 2016
      

-- Company records $44.5 million in total net product sales --
-- Company reiterates 2016 total net product sales guidance of between $130 and $150 million --


        CAMBRIDGE, Mass., Aug. 09, 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) --  Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AEGR), a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, announced its financial results and business update for the second quarter of 2016.
      

Highlights



          Aegerion recorded total net product sales of $44.5 million in the second quarter of 2016.
        

          Aegerion recorded $31.1 million in net product sales of JUXTAPID (lomitapide) capsules in the second quarter of 2016, $20.4 million, or 66% of which was from prescriptions written in the United States (U.S.). As of June 30, 2016, there were 423 active HoFH patients on JUXTAPID therapy globally, approximately 296 of whom are U.S. patients.
        

          Aegerion recorded $13.5 million in net product sales of MYALEPT (metreleptin) for injection in the second quarter of 2016, $9.9 million, or 73% of which was from prescriptions written in the U.S. As of June 30, 2016, there were 116 active generalized lipodystrophy (GL) patients on commercial therapy globally, approximately 94 of whom are U.S. patients.
        

          On June 14, 2016, Aegerion agreed to a strategic merger with QLT Inc. The proposed merger would create a well-capitalized, rare-disease focused, global biopharmaceutical company with a diversified portfolio, including JUXTAPID and MYALEPT, and QLT's QLT091001, being developed for the treatment of certain inherited retinal diseases. A broad-based investor syndicate committed to vote in favor of the merger and to invest approximately $22 million in QLT immediately prior to the merger. Upon completion of the merger, expected in the fourth quarter of 2016, QLT Inc. is expected to change its name to Novelion Therapeutics Inc.
        

          Aegerion recently executed a reduction in workforce of approximately 13% and announced its intention to withdraw lomitapide from the European Union (EU) and certain other global markets. These decisions are part of a broad cost reduction program designed to reduce operating expenses, extend the Company's cash position and facilitate cash generation from operations in 2017.
        

          Aegerion intends to submit a marketing authorization application (MAA) for metreleptin to treat generalized lipodystrophy and severe partial lipodystrophy in the EU by the end of 2016.
        

          Aegerion continues to anticipate marketing approval for lomitapide in Japan by year-end 2016.             
        


        Chief Executive Officer Mary Szela commented, 'In January our management team laid out a roadmap to transform Aegerion and return to growth. In the second quarter, we made important progress with the announcement of the proposed merger between Aegerion and QLT Inc. This merger will leverage Aegerion's development and commercial capabilities and further our ability to have a transformative impact on patients suffering from debilitating rare diseases. Upon closing of the transaction, Novelion will emerge a stronger company, with Aegerion's two marketed products, global commercial operations and a more robust pipeline. In addition, Novelion will be well funded, with an unrestricted pro forma cash balance of over $100 million.'
      

        'We remain fully committed to maximizing JUXTAPID and MYALEPT, and expect both products to continue serving as important pillars of our business. While we continue to see erosion of JUXTAPID patients at a meaningful rate, due to the availability of PCSK9 inhibitors, we remain confident that we have a base of HoFH patients for whom PCSK9 inhibitors will prove insufficient and for whom JUXTAPID will remain an important treatment. We also have early encouraging signs of adult HoFH patients coming back onto JUXTAPID therapy after being treated with a PCSK9 inhibitor, although the numbers remain small at this time.
      

        'MYALEPT remains an important growth driver for Aegerion. We have received positive feedback from physicians and GL patients about the importance of this therapy, and are working diligently to achieve our goals of expanding into global markets and additional indications. We were pleased to have recorded our first ex-U.S. sales of MYALEPT in the second quarter, and look forward to continuing our momentum to deliver this therapy to patients in need globally,' Ms. Szela concluded.
      

Financial Results


        Total net product sales for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016 were $44.5 million, compared with $64.2 million in the second quarter of 2015. Total net product sales for the six months ended June 30, 2016 were $80.2 million, compared with $123.6 million for the six months ended June 30, 2015.  
      

        Net product sales for JUXTAPID for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016 were $31.1 million, compared with $57.1 million in the second quarter ended June 30, 2015. $20.4 million, or 66% of net product sales in the second quarter of 2016 were from prescriptions written in the U.S. The decrease in net product sales is primarily attributable to a lower patient base as a result of the introduction of PCSK9 inhibitor products in the U.S. in the third quarter of 2015, partially offset by an increase in international revenue due to a large shipment in Brazil in the second quarter of 2016.
      

        Net product sales for JUXTAPID for the six months ended June 30, 2016 were $57.2 million, compared with $114.4 million for the six months ended June 30, 2015.
      

        Net product sales for MYALEPT for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016 were $13.5 million, compared with $7.1 million in the second quarter ended June 30, 2015. The gross-to-net adjustment for sales of MYALEPT in the U.S. for the quarter ended June 30, 2016 was approximately 29%. Of the 29%, approximately 27% was attributable to Medicaid rebates. The increase in net product sales in the second quarter of 2016 is attributed to an increase in the number of patients on therapy in the U.S. as well as a bulk shipment to Brazil for several GL patients and multiple months of therapy. Due to ordering patterns, the Company expects net product sales from named patient sales in ex-U.S. countries to fluctuate significantly quarter-over-quarter.
      

        Net product sales for MYALEPT for the six months ended June 30, 2016 were $23.0 million, compared with $9.2 million for the six months ended June 30, 2015.
      

        For the second quarter ended June 30, 2016, GAAP net loss was $46.8 million, or $1.59 basic and diluted loss per share, compared with a GAAP net loss of $11.2 million, or $0.39 basic and diluted loss per share, for the same period in 2015. For the six months ended June 30, 2016, GAAP net loss was $112.4 million, or $3.81 basic and diluted loss per share, compared with a GAAP net loss of $27.0 million, or $0.94 basic and diluted loss per share, for the same period in 2015.
      

        For the second quarter ended June 30, 2016, total operating expenses on a GAAP basis were $60.8 million, compared with $55.1 million for the same period in 2015. For the six months ended June 30, 2016, total operating expenses on a GAAP basis were $140.4 million, compared with $111.9 million for the same period in 2015.
      

        Selling, general and administrative expenses were $40.4 million for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016, compared to $42.7 million for the same period in 2015. Selling, general and administrative expenses were $80.1 million for the six months ended June 30, 2016, compared to $89.6 million for the same period in 2015. The decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses for the second quarter of 2016 over the comparable period in 2015 was primarily attributed to a decrease in salary and employee-related costs and stock-based compensation due to a reduction in headcount in both the selling and administrative functions as part of the reduction in force in February 2016 and executive turnover.
      

        Research and development expenses were $10.7 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2016 compared to $12.5 million for the same period in 2015. Research and development expenses were $20.6 million for the six months ended June 30, 2016, compared to $22.3 million for the same period in 2015. The decrease in research and development expenses for the second quarter of 2016 over the comparable period in 2015 was primarily attributable to a decrease in outside services and consulting expense.
      

        Due to the significant sustained decline in Aegerion's stock price that continued during the second quarter of 2016 and other qualitative factors, the Company performed an interim goodwill impairment test as of June 30, 2016, and determined that its goodwill was impaired. As a result, Aegerion has recorded an impairment charge of $9.6 million in the second quarter of 2016.
      

        The Company expects that operating expenses will continue to decrease throughout 2016 due to the reductions in workforce announced in February and July 2016, the decision to withdraw lomitapide from select global markets, and reductions in legal fees following the preliminary agreements in principle with the DOJ and SEC, though the reduction will be partially offset by ongoing transaction-related costs.
      

        Aegerion's non-GAAP operating results are GAAP operating results adjusted for the following items: 1) the impact of stock-based compensation; 2) the amortization of debt discount and deferred financing costs; 3) the amortization of intangible assets acquired; 4) the purchase price allocation accounting effects on the stepped up fair value of metreleptin inventory that the Company acquired in cost of product sales; and 5) the impairment of goodwill. A full reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP financial results is included later in this press release. Prior year non-GAAP financial results conform to current year presentation.
      

        For the second quarter ended June 30, 2016, non-GAAP net loss was $21.4 million, or $0.72 basic loss per share, compared with non-GAAP net income of $6.2 million, or $0.22 basic earnings per share, for the same period in 2015. For the six months ended June 30, 2016, non-GAAP net loss was $72.2 million, or $2.45 basic loss per share, compared with non-GAAP net income of $7.7 million, or $0.27 basic earnings per share, for the same period in 2015.
      

        Unrestricted cash and cash equivalents totaled $46.1 million as of June 30, 2016, compared to $64.5 million as of December 31, 2015.
      

2016 Financial Guidance


        Aegerion reiterated the following financial guidance for 2016:



          Aegerion expects total full-year 2016 global net product sales to be between $130 million and $150 million.
        

          Aegerion expects full-year 2016 global net product sales of JUXTAPID to be between $90 million and $100 million.
        

          Aegerion expects full-year 2016 global net product sales of MYALEPT to be between $40 million and $50 million.
        


About Aegerion Pharmaceuticals


        Aegerion Pharmaceuticals is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases. For more information about the company, please visit www.aegerion.com.
      

Non-GAAP Results


        The non-GAAP results in this press release are provided as a complement to results provided in accordance with GAAP because management believes these non-GAAP financial measures help indicate underlying trends in the Company's business, are important in comparing current results with prior period results and provide additional information regarding its financial position. Management also uses these non-GAAP financial measures to establish budgets and operational goals that are communicated internally and externally, and to manage the Company's business and to evaluate its performance. A reconciliation of the GAAP financial results to non-GAAP financial results is included in the attached financial information.
      

Additional Information about the Proposed Transaction and Where to Find It


        This communication does not constitute an offer to buy or solicitation of any offer to sell securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. It does not constitute a prospectus and no offering of securities shall be made except by means of a prospectus meeting the requirements of Section 10 of the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, as amended. This communication relates to the proposed transaction between QLT. In connection with the proposed transaction, QLT filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a registration statement on Form S-4 that includes a joint proxy statement/prospectus of Aegerion and QLT that also includes a prospectus relating to the QLT common shares to be issued in connection with the proposed transaction and a circular to QLT shareholders. After the registration statement on Form S-4 is declared effective by the SEC, Aegerion and QLT will mail the joint proxy statement/prospectus to their respective shareholders in connection with the transaction. This communication is not a substitute for the registration statement, joint proxy statement/prospectus, circular or other documents that QLT and/or Aegerion may file with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction.
      

        INVESTORS OF QLT AND AEGERION ARE URGED TO READ THE REGISTRATION STATEMENT, JOINT PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS, CIRCULAR AND OTHER DOCUMENTS WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT QLT, AEGERION AND THE PROPOSED TRANSACTION. Aegerion stockholders will be able to obtain the registration statement, joint proxy statement/prospectus and circular, as well as other filings containing information about Aegerion, QLT and the proposed transaction, free of charge, at the website maintained by the SEC at www.sec.gov and, in QLT's case, also on the SEDAR website maintained by the Canadian Securities Administrators ('CSA') at www.sedar.com. Aegerion stockholders may also obtain these documents, free of charge, from Aegerion's website (www.Aegerion.com) under 'Investors-Financial Information-SEC Filings' or by directing a request to Aegerion's Secretary at Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc., One Main Street, Suite 800, Cambridge, MA 02142. QLT shareholders may also obtain these documents, free of charge, from QLT's website at www.QLTinc.com under 'Investors-Securities Filings-Proxy Circulars' or upon request directly to QLT to the attention of 'QLT Investor Relations,' 887 Great Northern Way, Suite 250, Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, V5T 4T5.
      

Participants in the Solicitation


        The respective directors and executive officers of Aegerion and QLT and other persons may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies in respect of the proposed transaction. Information regarding Aegerion's directors and executive officers is available or incorporated by reference in its Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on March 15, 2016, and information regarding QLT directors and executive officers is available in its Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC and the CSA on February 25, 2016, as amended by its Annual Report on Form 10-K/A filed with the SEC and the CSA on April 29, 2016. These documents can be obtained free of charge from the sources indicated above. Other information regarding the interests of the participants in the proxy solicitation will be included in the registration statement, joint proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials to be filed with the SEC and the CSA.
      

Forward-Looking Statements


        This press release contains forward-looking statements, including statements regarding: our expectations about JUXTAPID's market opportunity; MYALEPT sales; the proposed transaction between QLT and Aegerion, the timing and financial and strategic benefits thereof, the expected impact of the transaction and private placement investment on the cash balance of the companies following the proposed merger; the financial aspects and results of our reductions in force and related matters; cash generation from Aegerion operations; the anticipated approval of MYALEPT in the EU and other regulatory activities related to MYALEPT; and the anticipated growth of the Aegerion business. These forward-looking statements are neither promises nor guarantees of future performance, and are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. In particular, the risks and uncertainties include, among others: the risk that we fail to receive, on a timely basis or otherwise, the required approvals by Aegerion and QLT shareholders and government or regulatory agencies that are necessary to close the merger; the risk that a condition to closing of the merger may not be satisfied; the possibility that the anticipated benefits and synergies from the proposed merger cannot be fully realized or may take longer to realize than expected; the possibility that costs or difficulties related to the integration of Aegerion and QLT operations will be greater than expected; the risk that market acceptance of JUXTAPID and MYALEPT in the U.S. may not continue at the levels we expect, and may be lower outside the U.S., including in Brazil, than we expect; the risk that the conversion of prescriptions for JUXTAPID or MYALEPT into patients on therapy may be lower than we expect or the drop-out rate may be higher than we expect; the risk that the prevalence of the diseases our products treat may be lower than our estimates, and that it may be more difficult to identify patients than we expect; the risk that the side effect profile or other results for our products in commercial use and in further clinical studies are inconsistent, in scope and severity, with the side effect profile and other results observed in the pivotal study of each drug; the risk that the negative impact of the launch of PCSK9 inhibitors on JUXTAPID sales will be greater than we currently expect, particularly in the U.S., where the negative impact has been greater than we expected to date, or that other competitive products will negatively impact our results; the risk that private or government payers may refuse to reimburse our products, or may impose onerous restrictions that hinder reimbursement or significantly limit or cap the price we charge or the number of reimbursed patients who receive our products; the risk that revisions to the JUXTAPID Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategies (REMS) Program may negatively impact our U.S. sales; the risk that our business may be negatively impacted if there are more Medicaid patients prescribed MYALEPT than we expect; the risk that named patient sales in Brazil and other key countries outside the U.S. may not be at the levels we expect; the risk that regulatory authorities in regions or countries where either of our products is not yet approved may refuse to approve such products or additional indications for such products, such approvals are not made on a timely basis or such approvals impose significant restrictions or require additional development; the risk that exchange rates will negatively impact the amount of net product sales recognized; the risk that the initiation of future clinical trials may be delayed; the risk that we will not be successful in our lifecycle management or business development efforts; the risk that our patent portfolio and marketing and data exclusivity may not be as strong as we anticipate; the risk of unexpected manufacturing issues affecting future supply; the risk that we incur more costs than we expect in responding to investigations, defending ourselves in litigation and resolving litigation; the risk that Silicon Valley Bank will accelerate our long-term debt; the risk that any of the foregoing may cause product sales revenue to be lower than we expect, or that we may incur unanticipated expenses in connection with our activities; the risk that we may not be able to enter into agreements with third parties respect to lomitapide as part of our strategic re-evaluation on acceptable terms, or at all, and the risk that our reputation may be harmed and we may be affected by negative publicity if we are unable to enter into agreements with third parties with respect to supplying lomitapide in the markets from which we intend to withdraw; the risk that we may not be able to successfully execute strategic plans, including our cost-reduction program; and the other risks inherent in the commercialization, drug development and regulatory approval process. In addition, Aegerion's agreement in principle with the DOJ and the SEC relating to the investigations by these agencies and the terms of potential final settlements with these agencies include risks associated with the required approvals of final settlement terms by relevant government agencies, such as the proposed settlement with the DOJ being subject to approval of supervisory personnel within the DOJ and relevant federal and state agencies and approval by a U.S. District Court judge of the criminal plea and sentence and the civil settlement agreement, and the proposed settlement with the SEC being subject to review by other groups in the SEC and approval by the Commissioners of the SEC.  The terms of the preliminary agreements in principle may change following further negotiations.  The amount and terms of any final settlement may be substantially higher and less favorable than we anticipate based on the terms of the preliminary agreements in principle.  Final settlement terms could include the imposition of additional penalties, further limiting our ability to conduct its business as currently conducted and as planned to be conducted. Additionally, the DOJ and the SEC each likely will outline their views of the factual background in connection with any final settlement.  The government's recitation of their assessment of the background could lead to additional legal claims or investigations by state government entities or private parties and may have adverse effects on our existing class action litigation, commercial operations and contracts.  For additional disclosure regarding these and other risks we face, see the disclosure contained in the 'Risk Factors' section of Aegerion's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 9, 2016, and our other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, available on the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. We undertake no obligation to update or revise the information contained in this press release, whether as a result of new information, future events or circumstances or otherwise.
      

        Investors and others should note that we communicate with our investors and the public using our company website (www.aegerion.com) and our investor relations website (http://ir.aegerion.com), including but not limited to company disclosures; investor presentations and FAQs; Securities and Exchange Commission filings; press releases; public conference calls and webcasts. The information that we post on these websites could be deemed to be material information. As a result, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested to review the information that we post there on a regular basis. The contents of our website shall not be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
      









Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.






Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations






            (unaudited)
          















Three Months Ended June 30,




Six Months Ended June 30,






(In 000s)




2016




2015




2016




2015






            Net product sales
          



            $
          



             44,530
          





            $
          



             64,197
          





            $
          



             80,246
          





            $
          



             123,581
          







            Cost of product sales
          







             23,063
          









             13,997
          









             38,029
          









             25,835
          







            Operating expenses:
          













































            Selling, general and administrative
          







             40,425
          









             42,672
          









             80,115
          









             89,600
          







            Research and development
          







             10,675
          









             12,471
          









             20,555
          









             22,269
          







            Provision for contingent litigation
          







             70
          









             -
          









             28,383
          









             -
          







            Impairment of goodwill
          







             9,600
          









             -
          









             9,600
          









             -
          







            Restructuring
          







             51
          









             -
          









             1,751
          









             -
          







            Total operating expenses
          







             60,821
          









             55,143
          









             140,404
          









             111,869
          







            Loss from operations
          







             (39,354
          

            )
          







             (4,943
          

            )
          







             (98,187
          

            )
          







             (14,123
          

            )
          





            Interest expense, net
          







             (7,449
          

            )
          







             (7,069
          

            )
          







             (14,651
          

            )
          







             (14,000
          

            )
          





            Other income, net
          







             223
          









             1,116
          









             961
          









             1,601
          







            Loss before provision for income taxes
          







             (46,580
          

            )
          







             (10,896
          

            )
          







             (111,877
          

            )
          







             (26,522
          

            )
          





            Provision for income taxes
          







             (229
          

            )
          







             (254
          

            )
          







             (486
          

            )
          







             (453
          

            )
          





            Net loss
          



            $
          



             (46,809
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (11,150
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (112,363
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (26,975
          

            )
          





            Net loss per common share - basic and diluted
          



            $
          



             (1.59
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (0.39
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (3.81
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (0.94
          

            )
          





            Weighted-average shares outstanding - basic and diluted
          







             29,504
          









             28,582
          









             29,487
          









             28,556
          























































Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.






Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets Information






            (unaudited)
          











 (In 000s)




June 30, 2016




December 31, 2015






            Cash and cash equivalents
          



            $
          

             46,064
          



            $
          

             64,501
          





            Restricted cash
          





             26,141
          





             25,529
          





            Accounts receivable
          





             9,077
          





             13,557
          





            Inventories
          





             43,889
          





             58,706
          





            Prepaid expenses and other current assets
          





             13,192
          





             13,645
          





            Property and equipment, net
          





             4,465
          





             4,893
          





            Intangible assets and goodwill, net
          





             232,825
          





             252,517
          





            Other assets
          





             225
          





             850
          





            Total assets
          



            $
          

             375,878
          



            $
          

             434,198
          























            Accounts payable and accrued liabilities
          



            $
          

             54,122
          



            $
          

             49,887
          





            Current portion of long-term debt
          





             25,000
          





             25,000
          





            Short-term debt, net
          





             2,841
          





             -
          





            Contingent litigation accrual
          





             40,383
          





             12,000
          





            Long-term convertible debt
          





             240,687
          





             229,782
          





            Other noncurrent liabilities
          





             1,722
          





             1,984
          





            Total liabilities
          





             364,755
          





             318,653
          





            Total stockholders' equity
          





             11,123
          





             115,545
          





            Total liabilities and stockholders' equity
          



            $
          

             375,878
          



            $
          

             434,198
          

























Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.




Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Information




(unaudited)












Three Months Ended June 30,




Six Months Ended June 30,




(In 000s)




2016




2015




2016




2015




Net loss reconciliation:




























            GAAP net loss
          



            $
          



             (46,809
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (11,150
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (112,363
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (26,975
          

            )
          



            Stock based compensation
          







             4,542
          









             7,209
          









             8,467
          









             14,368
          





            Amortization of debt discount & deferred financing fees
          







             5,571
          









             4,968
          









             10,906
          









             9,653
          





            Amortization of acquired intangible assets
          







             5,046
          









             4,952
          









             10,092
          









             10,187
          





            Inventory fair value step-up in cost of product sales
          







             675
          









             176
          









             1,122
          









             496
          





            Impairment of goodwill
          







             9,600
          









            -
          









             9,600
          









            -
          





            Non-GAAP net income/(loss)
          



            $
          



             (21,375
          

            )
          



            $
          



             6,155
          





            $
          



             (72,176
          

            )
          



            $
          



             7,729
          

































            GAAP net loss per common share - basic and diluted
          



            $
          



             (1.59
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (0.39
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (3.81
          

            )
          



            $
          



             (0.94
          

            )
          































            Non-GAAP net income/(loss) per common share - basic
          



            $
          



             (0.72
          

            )
          



            $
          



             0.22
          





            $
          



             (2.45
          

            )
          



            $
          



             0.27
          

































            GAAP and Non-GAAP weighted-average common shares outstanding - basic 
          







             29,504
          









             28,582
          









             29,487
          









             28,556
          

































Cost of product sales reconciliation:




























            GAAP cost of product sales
          



            $
          



             23,063
          





            $
          



             13,997
          





            $
          



             38,029
          





            $
          



             25,835
          





            Amortization of acquired intangible assets
          







             (5,046
          

            )
          







             (4,952
          

            )
          







             (10,092
          

            )
          







             (10,187
          

            )
          



            Inventory fair value step-up in cost of product sales
          







             (675
          

            )
          







             (176
          

            )
          







             (1,122
          

            )
          







             (496
          

            )
          



            Non-GAAP cost of product sales
          



            $
          



             17,342
          





            $
          



             8,869
          





            $
          



             26,815
          





            $
          



             15,152
          

































Selling, general and administrative reconciliation:




























            GAAP selling, general and administrative
          



            $
          



             40,425
          





            $
          



             42,672
          





            $
          



             80,115
          





            $
          



             89,600
          





            Stock based compensation
          







             (3,597
          

            )
          







             (6,139
          

            )
          







             (7,175
          

            )
          







             (12,308
          

            )
          



            Non-GAAP selling, general and administrative
          



            $
          



             36,828
          





            $
          



             36,533
          





            $
          



             72,940
          





            $
          



             77,292
          

































Research and development reconciliation:




























            GAAP research and development
          



            $
          



             10,675
          





            $
          



             12,471
          





            $
          



             20,555
          





            $
          



             22,269
          





            Stock based compensation
          







             (945
          

            )
          







             (1,070
          

            )
          







             (1,292
          

            )
          







             (2,060
          

            )
          



            Non-GAAP research and development
          



            $
          



             9,730
          





            $
          



             11,401
          





            $
          



             19,263
          





            $
          



             20,209
          





CONTACT:

Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
Amanda Murphy
Associate Director, Investor Relations & Public Relations
(857) 242-5024
[email protected]


Close window | Back to top














Sharing and Personal Tools

Please select the service you want to use:

Newsvine
Digg
Delicious
StumbleUpon
Technorati
Buzz
Favorites
Google Reader





Public link

Please use the above public link if you want to share this noodl on another website.


Close





Smartlinks
| Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Inc.
| Judiciary
| Local News
| Policy and Regulation
| Top Business and Economy News
| Company News
| Top Company News
| Manufacturing
| Pharmaceuticals
| Judiciary
| Pharmaceutical Companies
| Nasdaq
| Börse Frankfurt
| Tradegate Exchange




 Back


 View original format











Copyright ©2006-2017 Public Technologies Inc.  | 
Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | Contact















Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer



















































Support: 888-992-3836 | Newswire | Home | Log in












Boards


Stocks


Commodities


Forex


Cryptocurrency


The Lounge




Hot!


Breakout Boards


iHub My Stocks Activity


Ticker Buzz Cloud


Most Read


Most Posted


Most Followed Members


Recent News


Active Boards


Site Stats


New Boards


Cannabis Stocks




Tools


Data Tools >


Charts


Trader Alerts


Trades


Portfolio


Top Lists


Price & News Alerts


Commodities


Markets in 3D




NewsWire


More Tools >


Newsletters


My Image Gallery


Advanced Search


Videos


All News


Stock Screener


News Filter


Live Charts


Live News


Live Desktop


Forex Prices


Commodities


ETF Center


Educational Channel


Personal Finance Q&A






Streamer


Level 2


Follow Feed
























QuoteChartLevel 2TradesNewsFinancialsHistoricalTechnical AnalysisMessage BoardAegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (delisted) (NASDAQ)




Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial Officer


Date : 09/20/2016 @ 8:50AM


Source : GlobeNewswire Inc.


Stock : Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (delisted) (AEGR)


Quote :  1.97  0.0 (0.00%) @ 2:05AM


 








Aegerion Pharmaceuticals Appoints Remi Menes as Chief Commercial OfficerTweet


Print


Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (delisted) (NASDAQ:AEGR)Historical Stock Chart
1 Year : From Jul 2016 to Jul 2017


Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AEGR), a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases, today announced the appointment of Remi A. Menes as chief commercial officer, effective immediately.
  Mary Szela, Chief Executive Officer of Aegerion said, “Remi brings extensive pre-launch and launch expertise and a proven ability to develop and lead commercial efforts globally. Commercialization of rare disease therapies takes a targeted approach and requires strong patient focus. Remi’s broad experience implementing holistic, patient-centered programs that demonstrate the value proposition of therapies make him ideally suited to lead our commercial operations globally, including our sales, marketing and market access efforts. We look forward to his contributions as we continue to drive and evolve our global commercial operations, and particularly as we prepare to submit a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT® in the EU by year-end and, upon anticipated marketing approval, launch JUXTAPID® in Japan.” Remi Menes most recently served as the General Manager of AbbVie Finland, where he was responsible for the Affiliate’s operations and P&L and its flagship product Humira. He also served as Board Member of Pharma Industry Finland. Before joining AbbVie Finland in 2013, Mr. Menes served as Area Commercial Director, Virology & Neonatal Care, Western Europe & Canada at AbbVie Europe. From 2008-2010, he was the Commercial Director, Specialty Products Division and a Member of the Affiliate Leadership Team at Abbott Canada. Between 1990 and 2008, Mr. Menes held a series of roles of increasing responsibility at Merck Frosst Canada Ltd., including Director, Sales & Marketing, in which he led the Canadian launch of SINGULAIR® for Allergic Rhinitis, and Product Manager for SINGULAIR and PROPECIA®/PROSCAR®. He holds an Executive M.B.A. and a B.Sc. in Organic Chemistry with a minor in Business Studies from Concordia University. About Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Aegerion Pharmaceuticals is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to the development and commercialization of innovative therapies for patients with debilitating rare diseases.  For more information about the company, please visit www.aegerion.com. Forward-Looking StatementsThis press release contains forward-looking statements, including statements regarding: the anticipated submission of a marketing authorization application for MYALEPT in the EU and the anticipated approval and launch of JUXTAPID in Japan. These forward-looking statements are neither promises nor guarantees of future performance, and are subject to a variety of risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. In particular, the risks and uncertainties include, among others: the risk that regulatory authorities in regions or countries where either of our products is not yet approved may refuse to approve such products, such approvals are not made on a timely basis or such approvals impose significant restrictions or require additional development; and the other risks inherent in the commercialization, drug development and regulatory approval process. For additional disclosure regarding these and other risks we face, see the disclosure contained in the "Risk Factors" section of Aegerion's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 9, 2016, and our other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, available on the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. We undertake no obligation to update or revise the information contained in this press release, whether as a result of new information, future events or circumstances or otherwise. Investors and others should note that we communicate with our investors and the public using our company website (www.aegerion.com) and our investor relations website (http://ir.aegerion.com), including but not limited to company disclosures; investor presentations and FAQs; Securities and Exchange Commission filings; press releases; public conference calls and webcasts. The information that we post on these websites could be deemed to be material information. As a result, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested to review the information that we post there on a regular basis. The contents of our website shall not be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
CONTACT:
Aegerion Pharmaceuticals, Inc.                                                        
Amanda Murphy, Associate Director, Investor & Public Relations                                 
857-242-5024  
Amanda.murphy@aegerion.com





 








Latest AEGR Messages




 View More Posts
 Remove From Favorites
 Add to Favorites















{{bbMessage.M_Alias}}

{{bbMessage.MSG_Date}}
{{bbMessage.HowLongAgo}}
{{bbMessage.MSG_ID}}

{{bbMessage.MSG_Subject}}






















												Share on Facebook
											


												 Share on Twitter
											

 
												 Share on Email
											












Loading Messages....







No posts yet, be the first!
No {{symbol}} Message Board. Create One!
See More Posts on {{symbol}} Message Board

See More Message Board Posts










 

 
Your Recent History
						


 


 







LSE






					GKP
				




				Gulf Keyst..
			








LSE






					QPP
				




				Quindell
			








FTSE






					UKX
				




				FTSE 100
			








LSE






					IOF
				




				Iofina
			








FX






					GBPUSD
				




				UK Sterlin..
			



 

Stocks you've viewed will appear in this box, letting you easily return to quotes you've seen previously.Register now to create your own custom streaming stock watchlist.
  



NYSE, AMEX, and ASX quotes are delayed by at least 20 minutes.All other quotes are delayed by at least 15 minutes unless otherwise stated.		
















































    Remi Menes | AbbVie Inc | ZoomInfo.com


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×








 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×








 





Rémy Martin

















Welcome to Rémy Martin

Please enter yourdate of birth

month
day
year




Please fill in all fields

Enter
→


		You must be of legal drinking ageto enter this site, Learn More 



remember me


                        Do not check this box when youare using a shared computer                    




You are not old enough to enter this website

You must be of legal drinking age to gain access to remymartin.com
Back




                    Visiting from                    


United States of America




                        BY ENTERING THIS SITE YOU ACCEPT OUR TERMS & CONDITIONS AND PRIVACY POLICY Rémy Martin ecourages responsible consumption. The abuse of alcohol is dangerous for your health. www.responsibledrinking.eu To visit remymartin.com, you must be of legal drinking age within your country of residence. If no such law exist in your country you have to be 21 to visit our site.                    







            WE USE COOKIES ON OUR WEBSITE TO OFFER YOU THE BEST SERVICE POSSIBLE. READ MORE IN OUR PRIVACY POLICY. BY CONTINUING TO BROWSE THIS WEBSITE YOU ACCEPT THE USE OF COOKIES. ×








